District of Columbia statutes.
38-156

Power to raze buildings; limitations.

The Mayor, with the consent of the Council by resolution, shall have the power to raze structures. The razing of any building, structure, or part of any building or structure that is on the National Register of Historic Places, the District of Columbia inventory of historic sites, or for which application for one of these listings is pending, shall not be approved.

History

June 20, 1906, ch. 3446, § 14
as added Sept. 11, 1990, D.C. Law 8-158, § 3, 37 DCR 4167
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 311, 44 DCR 1423
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 703, 47 DCR 6308
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1003(e), 54 DCR 4102

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-120.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-172 deleted the concluding sentence providing: “Any contract services required to carry out this purpose shall be procured through the Office of Contracting and Procurement.”
D.C. Law 17-9 substituted “The Mayor, with the consent of the Council by resolution,” for “The Board of Education, upon the approval of the Mayor, and with the consent of the Council by resolution,”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) authorization to fix and regulate salaries of teachers and other employees, see § 703 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 703 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).

Editor's Notes

Authorization to charge fees for educational courses: For temporary authorization of the District of Columbia Board of Education to charge fees for select adult, community, and continuing education courses, see §§ 2-5 of the District of Columbia Board of Education Fees for Select Adult, Community, and Continuing Education Courses Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-299, July 25, 1994, 41 DCR 5186).